Tennessee, session 114, SB2294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-9-218(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "fifty feet (50')" and substituting "seventy-five feet (75')".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2294
012399
- 1 -